California, session 20252026, SB590.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 3301 of the Unemployment Insurance Code is amended to read:3301. (a) (1) The purpose of this chapter is to establish, within the state disability insurance program, a family temporary disability insurance program. Family temporary disability insurance shall provide up to eight weeks of wage replacement benefits to workers who take time off work to care for a seriously ill child, spouse, parent, grandparent, grandchild, sibling, or domestic partner, to bond with a minor child within one year of the birth or placement of the child in connection with foster care or adoption, or to participate in a qualifying exigency related to the covered active duty or call to covered active duty of the individual’s spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the United States.(2) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to abridge the rights and responsibilities conveyed under the California Family Rights Act or pregnancy disability leave.(b) (1) An individual’s “weekly benefit amount” for periods of disability commencing before January 1, 2025, shall be the amount provided in Section 2655, and for periods of disability commencing on or after January 1, 2025, shall be the amount provided in paragraph (2). An individual is eligible to receive family temporary disability insurance benefits equal to one-seventh of the individual’s weekly benefit amount for each full day during which the individual is unable to work due to caring for a seriously ill or injured family member, bonding with a minor child within one year of the birth or placement of the child in connection with foster care or adoption, or participating in a qualifying exigency related to the covered active duty or call to covered active duty of the individual’s spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the United States.(2) For periods of disability commencing on or after January 1, 2025, the weekly benefit amount shall be as follows:(A) When the amount of wages paid to the individual for employment by employers during the quarter of the individual’s disability base period in which these wages were highest is less than seven hundred twenty-two dollars and fifty cents ($722.50), then fifty dollars ($50).(B) When the amount of wages paid to the individual for employment by employers during the quarter of the individual’s disability base period in which these wages were highest is more than 70 percent of the state average quarterly wage, the weekly benefit amount shall be equal to the greater of 70 percent of the wages paid to an individual for employment by employers during the quarter of the individual’s disability base period in which these wages were highest, divided by 13, but not exceeding the maximum workers’ compensation temporary disability indemnity weekly benefit amount established by the Department of Industrial Relations pursuant to Section 4453 of the Labor Code, or 63 percent of the state average weekly wage.(C) When the amount of wages paid to the individual for employment by employers during the quarter of the individual’s disability base period in which these wages were highest is seven hundred twenty-two dollars and fifty cents ($722.50) or more, but 70 percent or less than the state average quarterly wage, then the weekly benefit amount shall be equal to 90 percent of the wages paid to an individual for employment by employers during the quarter of the individual’s disability base period in which these wages were highest, divided by 13, but not exceeding the maximum workers’ compensation temporary disability indemnity weekly benefit amount established by the Department of Industrial Relations pursuant to Section 4453 of the Labor Code.(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “state average weekly wage” and “state average quarterly wage” have the same meanings as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 2655.(c) The maximum amount payable to an individual during any disability benefit period for family temporary disability insurance shall be eight times the individual’s “weekly benefit amount,” but in no case shall the total amount of benefits payable be more than the total wages paid to the individual during the individual’s disability base period. If the benefit is not a multiple of one dollar ($1), it shall be computed to the next higher multiple of one dollar ($1).(d) No more than eight weeks of family temporary disability insurance benefits shall be paid within any 12-month period.(e) An individual shall file a claim for family temporary disability insurance benefits not later than the 41st consecutive day following the first compensable day with respect to which the claim is made for benefits, which time shall be extended by the department upon a showing of good cause. If a first claim is not complete, the claim form shall be returned to the claimant for completion and it shall be completed and returned not later than the 10th consecutive day after the date it was mailed by the department to the claimant, except that such time shall be extended by the department upon a showing of good cause.(f) This section shall remain in effect only until Section 3301.5 is incorporated in the Employment Development Department’s integrated claims management system as part of the EDDNext project, and as of that date is repealed.(g) This section shall remain in effect only until July 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. Section 3301 is added to the Unemployment Insurance Code, to read:3301. (a) (1) The purpose of this chapter is to establish, within the state disability insurance program, a family temporary disability insurance program. Family temporary disability insurance shall provide up to eight weeks of wage replacement benefits to workers who take time off work to care for a seriously ill child, spouse, parent, grandparent, grandchild, sibling, domestic partner, or designated person, to bond with a minor child within one year of the birth or placement of the child in connection with foster care or adoption, or to participate in a qualifying exigency related to the covered active duty or call to covered active duty of the individual’s spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the United States.(2) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to abridge the rights and responsibilities conveyed under the California Family Rights Act or pregnancy disability leave.(b) (1) An individual’s “weekly benefit amount” for periods of disability commencing before January 1, 2025, shall be the amount provided in Section 2655, and for periods of disability commencing on or after January 1, 2025, shall be the amount provided in paragraph (2). An individual is eligible to receive family temporary disability insurance benefits equal to one-seventh of the individual’s weekly benefit amount for each full day during which the individual is unable to work due to caring for a seriously ill or injured family member, bonding with a minor child within one year of the birth or placement of the child in connection with foster care or adoption, or participating in a qualifying exigency related to the covered active duty or call to covered active duty of the individual’s spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the United States.(2) For periods of disability commencing on or after January 1, 2025, the weekly benefit amount shall be as follows:(A) When the amount of wages paid to the individual for employment by employers during the quarter of the individual’s disability base period in which these wages were highest is less than seven hundred twenty-two dollars and fifty cents ($722.50), then fifty dollars ($50).(B) When the amount of wages paid to the individual for employment by employers during the quarter of the individual’s disability base period in which these wages were highest is more than 70 percent of the state average quarterly wage, the weekly benefit amount shall be equal to the greater of 70 percent of the wages paid to an individual for employment by employers during the quarter of the individual’s disability base period in which these wages were highest, divided by 13, but not exceeding the maximum workers’ compensation temporary disability indemnity weekly benefit amount established by the Department of Industrial Relations pursuant to Section 4453 of the Labor Code, or 63 percent of the state average weekly wage.(C) When the amount of wages paid to the individual for employment by employers during the quarter of the individual’s disability base period in which these wages were highest is seven hundred twenty-two dollars and fifty cents ($722.50) or more, but 70 percent or less than the state average quarterly wage, then the weekly benefit amount shall be equal to 90 percent of the wages paid to an individual for employment by employers during the quarter of the individual’s disability base period in which these wages were highest, divided by 13, but not exceeding the maximum workers’ compensation temporary disability indemnity weekly benefit amount established by the Department of Industrial Relations pursuant to Section 4453 of the Labor Code.(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “state average weekly wage” and “state average quarterly wage” have the same meanings as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 2655.(c) The maximum amount payable to an individual during any disability benefit period for family temporary disability insurance shall be eight times the individual’s “weekly benefit amount,” but in no case shall the total amount of benefits payable be more than the total wages paid to the individual during the individual’s disability base period. If the benefit is not a multiple of one dollar ($1), it shall be computed to the next higher multiple of one dollar ($1).(d) No more than eight weeks of family temporary disability insurance benefits shall be paid within any 12-month period.(e) An individual shall file a claim for family temporary disability insurance benefits not later than the 41st consecutive day following the first compensable day with respect to which the claim is made for benefits, which time shall be extended by the department upon a showing of good cause. If a first claim is not complete, the claim form shall be returned to the claimant for completion and it shall be completed and returned not later than the 10th consecutive day after the date it was mailed by the department to the claimant, except that such time shall be extended by the department upon a showing of good cause.(f) This section shall remain in effect only until Section 3301.5 is incorporated in the Employment Development Department’s integrated claims management system as part of the EDDNext project, and as of that date is repealed.(g) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2028.SEC. 3. Section 3302 of the Unemployment Insurance Code is amended to read:3302. On and after July 1, 2014, for purposes of this part:(a) “Care recipient” means the family member who is receiving care for a serious health condition or the new child with whom the care provider is bonding. For the purposes of a qualifying exigency as set forth in Section 3302.2, “care recipient” also includes the military member, or child or parent of the military member, who is receiving assistance, or the employee who is participating in a qualifying exigency.(b) “Care provider” means the family member who is providing the required care for a serious health condition; the family member who is bonding with the new child; or the employee who is participating in a qualifying exigency as provided in Section 3302.2.(c) “Child” means a biological, adopted, or foster son or daughter, a stepson or stepdaughter, a legal ward, a son or daughter of a domestic partner, or the person to whom the employee stands in loco parentis.(d) “Domestic partner” has the same meaning as defined in Section 297 of the Family Code.(e) “Family care leave” means any of the following:(1) Leave to bond with a minor child within the first year of the child’s birth or placement in connection with foster care or adoption.(2) Leave to care for a child, parent, grandparent, grandchild, sibling, spouse, or domestic partner who has a serious health condition.(3) Leave to participate in a qualifying exigency as provided in Section 3302.2.(f) “Family member” means child, parent, grandparent, grandchild, sibling, spouse, or domestic partner as defined in this section.(g) “Grandchild” means a child of the employee’s child.(h) “Grandparent” means a parent of the employee’s parent.(i) “Military member” means a child, spouse, domestic partner, or parent of the employee, where the military member is on covered active duty or call to active duty in the Armed Forces of the United States as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 3302.1.(j) “Parent” means a biological, foster, or adoptive parent, a parent-in-law, a stepparent, a legal guardian, or other person who stood in loco parentis to the employee when the employee was a child.(k) “Parent-in-law” means the parent of a spouse or a domestic partner.(l) “Serious health condition” means an illness, injury, impairment, or physical or mental condition that involves inpatient care in a hospital, hospice, or residential health care facility, or continuing treatment or continuing supervision by a health care provider, as defined in Section 12945.2 of the Government Code.(m) “Sibling” means a person related to another person by blood, adoption, or affinity through a common legal or biological parent.(n) “Spouse” means a partner to a lawful marriage.(o) “Valid claim” means any claim for family temporary disability insurance benefits made in accordance with the provisions of this code, and any rules and regulations adopted thereunder, if the individual claiming benefits is unemployed and has been paid the necessary wages in employment for employers to qualify for benefits under Section 2652 and is caring for a seriously ill family member, or bonding with a minor child during the first year after the birth or placement of the child in connection with foster care or adoption.(p) “Twelve-month period,” with respect to any individual, means the 365 consecutive days that begin with the first day the individual first establishes a valid claim for family temporary disability benefits.(q) This section shall remain in effect only until July 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 4. Section 3302 is added to the Unemployment Insurance Code, to read:3302. On and after July 1, 2028, for purposes of this part:(a) “Care recipient” means the family member who is receiving care for a serious health condition or the new child with whom the care provider is bonding. For the purposes of a qualifying exigency as set forth in Section 3302.2, “care recipient” also includes the military member, or child or parent of the military member, who is receiving assistance, or the employee who is participating in a qualifying exigency.(b) “Care provider” means the family member who is providing the required care for a serious health condition; the family member who is bonding with the new child; or the employee who is participating in a qualifying exigency as provided in Section 3302.2.(c) “Child” means a biological, adopted, or foster son or daughter, a stepson or stepdaughter, a legal ward, a son or daughter of a domestic partner, or the person to whom the employee stands in loco parentis.(d) “Designated person” means any care recipient related by blood or whose association with the individual is the equivalent of a family relationship.(e) “Domestic partner” has the same meaning as defined in Section 297 of the Family Code.(f) “Family care leave” means any of the following:(1) Leave to bond with a minor child within the first year of the child’s birth or placement in connection with foster care or adoption.(2) Leave to care for a child, parent, grandparent, grandchild, sibling, spouse, domestic partner, or designated person who has a serious health condition.(3) Leave to participate in a qualifying exigency as provided in Section 3302.2.(g) “Family member” means a child, parent, grandparent, grandchild, sibling, spouse, domestic partner, or designated person.(h) “Grandchild” means a child of the employee’s child.(i) “Grandparent” means a parent of the employee’s parent.(j) “Military member” means a child, spouse, domestic partner, or parent of the employee, where the military member is on covered active duty or call to active duty in the Armed Forces of the United States as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 3302.1.(k) “Parent” means a biological, foster, or adoptive parent, a parent-in-law, a stepparent, a legal guardian, or other person who stood in loco parentis to the employee when the employee was a child.(l) “Parent-in-law” means the parent of a spouse or a domestic partner.(m) “Serious health condition” means an illness, injury, impairment, or physical or mental condition that involves inpatient care in a hospital, hospice, or residential health care facility, or continuing treatment or continuing supervision by a health care provider, as defined in Section 12945.2 of the Government Code.(n) “Sibling” means a person related to another person by blood, adoption, or affinity through a common legal or biological parent.(o) “Spouse” means a partner to a lawful marriage.(p) “Valid claim” means any claim for family temporary disability insurance benefits made in accordance with the provisions of this code, and any rules and regulations adopted thereunder, if the individual claiming benefits is unemployed and has been paid the necessary wages in employment for employers to qualify for benefits under Section 2652 and is caring for a seriously ill family member, or bonding with a minor child during the first year after the birth or placement of the child in connection with foster care or adoption.(q) “Twelve-month period,” with respect to any individual, means the 365 consecutive days that begin with the first day the individual first establishes a valid claim for family temporary disability benefits.(r) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2028.SEC. 5. Section 3303 of the Unemployment Insurance Code is amended to read:3303. (a) On and after July 1, 2014, only if the director makes both of the findings described in subdivision (b), an individual shall be deemed eligible for family temporary disability insurance benefits equal to one-seventh of their weekly benefit amount on any day in which the individual is unable to perform their regular or customary work because of any of the following:(1) The individual is bonding with a minor child during the first year after the birth or placement of the child in connection with foster care or adoption.(2) The individual is caring for a seriously ill child, parent, grandparent, grandchild, sibling, spouse, or domestic partner.(3) The individual is participating in a qualifying exigency related to the covered active duty or call to covered active duty of the individual’s spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the United States.(b) An individual shall be deemed eligible for family temporary disability insurance benefits described in subdivision (a) only if the director finds both of the following:(1) The individual has made a claim for temporary disability benefits as required by authorized regulations.(2) The individual has filed a certificate, as required by Sections 2708 and 2709, or for purposes of participating in a qualifying exigency related to the covered active duty or call to covered active duty of the individual’s spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the United States, has provided the information requested pursuant to Section 3307.(c) This section shall remain in effect only until July 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 6. Section 3303 is added to the Unemployment Insurance Code, to read:3303. (a) On and after July 1, 2028, only if the director makes both of the findings described in subdivision (b), an individual shall be deemed eligible for family temporary disability insurance benefits equal to one-seventh of their weekly benefit amount on any day in which the individual is unable to perform their regular or customary work because of any of the following:(1) The individual is bonding with a minor child during the first year after the birth or placement of the child in connection with foster care or adoption.(2) (A) The individual is caring for a seriously ill child, parent, grandparent, grandchild, sibling, spouse, domestic partner, or designated person.(B) When an individual requests for the first time family temporary disability insurance benefits to care for a designated person, the individual shall do both of the following:(i) The individual shall identify the designated person.(ii) The individual shall, under penalty of perjury, attest to either of the following:(I) How the individual is related by blood to the designated person.(II) How the individual’s association with the designated person is the equivalent of a family relationship.(3) The individual is participating in a qualifying exigency related to the covered active duty or call to covered active duty of the individual’s spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the United States.(b) An individual shall be deemed eligible for family temporary disability insurance benefits described in subdivision (a) only if the director finds both of the following:(1) The individual has made a claim for temporary disability benefits as required by authorized regulations.(2) The individual has filed a certificate, as required by Sections 2708 and 2709, or for purposes of participating in a qualifying exigency related to the covered active duty or call to covered active duty of the individual’s spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the United States, has provided the information requested pursuant to Section 3307.(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2028.SEC. 7. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.